Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.100

Membership in associations with similar objectives—Contracting with such associations.

(1) Any member of the commission also may be a member or officer of an association which has similar objectives for which the agricultural commission was formed.

(2) An agricultural commission also may contract with such an association for services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized under this chapter, provided that an appropriate contract has been entered into, and provided that any members with potential conflicts of interest comply with applicable provisions in chapter 42.52 RCW.

[ 2009 c 33 s 10.]